Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.035

Administration and use of enterprise services account—Director's authority to lease and acquire surplus property.

The enterprise services account shall be administered by the director of enterprise services and be used for the purchase, lease or other acquisition from time to time of surplus property from any federal, state, or local government surplus property disposal agency. The director may purchase, lease or acquire such surplus property on the requisition of an eligible donee and without such requisition at such time or times as he or she deems it advantageous to do so; and in either case he or she shall be responsible for the care and custody of the property purchased so long as it remains in his or her possession.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 252; 1998 c 105 s 3; 1995 c 137 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 135 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 70 s 4; 1945 c 205 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-63. Formerly RCW 39.32.030, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.